Wisconsin, session 2025, SB781.
do enact as follows:SB781,11Section 1. 121.07 (6) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB781,2,122121.07 (6) (a) (intro.) “Shared Subject to pars. (am) and (ap), “shared cost” is 3the sum of the net cost of the general fund and the net cost of the debt service fund, 4except that “shared cost” excludes any costs, including attorney fees, incurred by a 5school district as a result of its participation in a lawsuit commenced against the 6state, beginning with such costs incurred in the fiscal year in which the lawsuit is 7commenced, excludes any expenditures from a capital improvement trust fund 8created under s. 120.137, excludes any debt service costs associated with an 9environmental remediation project under s. 67.05 (7) (er), and excludes the costs of 10transporting those transfer pupils for whom the school district operating under ch. 11119 does not receive intradistrict transfer aid under s. 121.85 (6) as a result of s. 12121.85 (6) (am). In this paragraph:SB781,213Section 2. 121.07 (6) (am) of the statutes is renumbered 121.07 (6) (am) 14(intro.) and amended to read:SB781,2,2215121.07 (6) (am) (intro.) In par. (a), for the purpose of calculating state aid paid 16to a school district beginning in the 2006-07 and 2007-08 school years 2026-27 17school year, “shared cost” excludes any the amount expended in the previous school 18year from the school district’s fund balance to pay the school district’s unfunded 19pension liability under the Wisconsin Retirement System or to pay debt service for 20debt issued to refinance the balance of the unfunded pension liability if the result of 21excluding such expenditures is an increase in state aid paid to the school district 22under s. 121.08. calculated as follows:SB781,31Section 3. 121.07 (6) (am) 1., 2. and 3. of the statutes are created to read:SB781,3,52121.07 (6) (am) 1. Determine the amount levied by the school district or levied 3for school purposes in the current school year that was authorized by a referendum 4approved under s. 121.91 (3) after the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB 5inserts date].SB781,3,762. Subtract the levy amount set by the school board from the maximum levy 7amount allowed under s. 121.91 (2m).SB781,3,983. If the difference under subd. 2. is a positive number, subtract that number9from the amount determined under subd. 1.SB781,410Section 4. 121.07 (6) (ap) of the statutes is created to read:SB781,3,1311121.07 (6) (ap) In par. (a), “debt service” excludes debt service on debt 12authorized by a referendum held after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB 13inserts date].SB781,3,1414